Washington statutes.
RCW 35.71.090

"Mall organization"—Powers in general—Directors—Officers.

The corporate authority may cause an organization of persons to be known as a "Mall organization" interested in creating a mall in a given area to be formed to provide for consultative assistance to the city with respect to the establishment and administration of a mall. This organization may elect a board of directors of not less than three nor more than twelve members. The board shall elect a president, a vice president, and a secretary from its membership.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.71.090. Prior: 1961 c 111 s 9.]